Utah statutes.
53-5-707.   Permit -- Fees -- Disposition.

(1) (a)  Each applicant for a permit shall pay a fee of $35 at the time of filing an application.

(b)  The initial fee shall be waived for an applicant who is a law enforcement officer under Section 53-13-103.

(2)  The renewal fee for the permit is $10.

(3)  The replacement fee for the permit is $10.

(4)  The late fee for the renewal permit is $7.50.

(5)  The bureau shall use the fees collected under Subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) as a dedicated credit to cover the costs of issuing concealed firearm permits under this part.

(6) (a)  The bureau may collect any fees charged by an outside agency for additional services required by statute as a prerequisite for issuance of a permit.

(b)  The bureau shall promptly forward any fees collected under Subsection (6)(a) to the appropriate agency.

(7)  The bureau shall make an annual report to the Legislature's Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee on the amount and use of the fees collected under this section.

